Nevada, session 83, SB431.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 368A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 10, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. “Affiliate” means a person who directly or indirectly
owns or controls, is owned or controlled by or is under common
ownership or control with another person. For the purposes of this
-
*SB431_R2*

– 3 –
section, control shall be presumed to exist if any person directly or
indirectly owns, controls, holds with the power to vote or holds
proxies representing 10 percent or more of the voting securities of
any other person. This presumption may be rebutted by a showing
that control does not exist in fact.
Sec. 3. 1. “Marketplace facilitator” means a person,
including any affiliate of the person, who:
(a) Directly or indirectly does one or more of the following to
facilitate the resale of admission to any facility in this State where
live entertainment is provided:
(1) Lists, makes available or advertises the resale of, by a
marketplace reseller in a marketplace owned, operated or
controlled by the person, admission to any facility in this State
where live entertainment is provided;
(2) Facilitates the resale of admission to any facility in this
State where live entertainment is provided when such resale is
facilitated by a marketplace reseller through a marketplace by
transmitting or otherwise communicating an offer or acceptance
of such a resale between a marketplace reseller and a purchaser in
a forum, including, without limitation, a shop, store, booth,
catalog, Internet website or similar forum;
(3) Owns, rents, licenses, makes available or operates any
electronic or physical infrastructure or any property, process,
method, copyright, trademark or patent that connects marketplace
resellers to purchasers for the purpose of making resales of
admission to any facility in this State where live entertainment is
provided;
(4) Provides a marketplace for making resales of admission
to any facility in this State where live entertainment is provided or
otherwise facilitates the resale of admission to any facility in this
State where live entertainment is provided, regardless of
ownership or control of the right or privilege of admission to the
facility in this State where live entertainment is provided that is the
subject of the resale;
(5) Provides software development or research and
development activities related to any activity described in this
subsection, if such software development or research and
development activities are directly related to the physical or
electronic marketplace provided by a marketplace provider;
(6) Provides or offers fulfillment or storage services for a
marketplace reseller;
(7) Sets prices for the resale by a marketplace reseller of
admission to any facility in this State where live entertainment is
provided;
-
*SB431_R2*

– 4 –
(8) Provides or offers customer service to a marketplace
reseller or the customers of a marketplace reseller, or accepts or
assists with taking orders, returns or exchanges of admission to
any facility in this State where live entertainment is provided
which was resold by a marketplace reseller; or
(9) Brands or otherwise identifies resales as those of the
marketplace facilitator; and
(b) Directly or indirectly does one or more of the following to
facilitate a sale:
(1) Collects the sales price or purchase price of a resale of
admission to any facility in this State where live entertainment is
provided;
(2) Provides payment processing services for a resale of
admission to any facility in this State where live entertainment is
provided;
(3) Charges, collects or otherwise receives selling fees,
listing fees, referral fees, closing fees, fees for inserting or making
available the resale of admission to any facility in this State where
live entertainment is provided on a marketplace or other
consideration from the facilitation of a resale of admission to any
facility in this State where live entertainment is provided,
regardless of ownership or control of the right or privilege of
admission to the facility in this State where live entertainment is
provided that is the subject of the resale;
(4) Through terms and conditions, agreements or
arrangements with a third party, collects payment from a
purchaser in connection with a resale of admission to any facility
in this State where live entertainment is provided and transmits
that payment to the marketplace reseller, regardless of whether the
person collecting and transmitting such payment receives
compensation or other consideration in exchange for the service;
or
(5) Provides a virtual currency that purchasers are allowed
or required to use to purchase a resale of admission to any facility
in this State where live entertainment is provided.
2. The term does not include a person who provides Internet
advertising services, including, without limitation, the listing for
resale of admission to any facility in this State where live
entertainment is provided, if the person does not directly or
indirectly or through an affiliate:
(a) Transmit or otherwise communicate an offer or acceptance
between a marketplace reseller and a purchaser of a resale of
admission to any facility in this State where live entertainment is
provided; and
-
*SB431_R2*

– 5 –
(b) Do one or more of the activities listed in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1.
Sec. 4. “Marketplace reseller” means a reseller who makes
resales of admission to any facility in this State where live
entertainment is provided, when such resale:
1. Is made through any physical or electronic marketplace
owned, operated or controlled by a marketplace facilitator, even if
the reseller would not have been required to collect and remit the
tax imposed by this chapter had the resale not been made through
such marketplace; or
2. Results from a referral by a referrer, even if the reseller
would not have been required to collect and remit the tax imposed
by this chapter had the resale not been made through such
referrer.
Sec. 5. “Resale” or “resell” means a transaction for the sale
of the admission to a facility in this State where live entertainment
is provided which occurs after the initial purchase of the
admission. The term includes, without limitation, a sale made in
person or by telephone, an Internet website or any other means of
communication or exchange.
Sec. 6. “Reseller” means any person who resells the
admission to a facility in this State where live entertainment is
provided.
Sec. 7. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
section 8 of this act, the provisions of this chapter relating to the
imposition, collection and remittance of the tax imposed by NRS
368A.200 apply to a marketplace facilitator during a calendar year
in which or during a calendar year immediately following any
calendar year in which:
(a) The cumulative gross receipts from retail sales of tangible
personal property to customers in this State and the sale of
admission to any facility in this State where live entertainment is
provided, which are made or facilitated by the marketplace
facilitator on its own behalf or for one or more marketplace
sellers, exceed $100,000; or
(b) The marketplace facilitator, on his or her own behalf or for
one or more marketplace sellers, makes or facilitates a combined
total of 200 or more separate sales transactions of tangible
personal property to customers in this State and of admission to
any facility in this State where live entertainment is provided.
2. The provisions of this chapter relating to the imposition,
collection and remittance of the tax imposed by NRS 368A.200 do
not apply to a marketplace facilitator described in subsection 1 if:
(a) The marketplace facilitator and the marketplace reseller
have entered into a written agreement whereby the marketplace
-
*SB431_R2*

– 6 –
reseller assumes responsibility for the collection and remittance of
the tax imposed by NRS 368A.200 for resales made by the
marketplace reseller through the marketplace facilitator; and
(b) The marketplace reseller has registered with the
Department to collect and remit the tax imposed by
NRS 368A.200.
 Upon request of the Department, a marketplace facilitator shall
provide to the Department a report containing the name of each
marketplace reseller with whom the marketplace facilitator has
entered into an agreement pursuant to this subsection and such
other information as the Department determines is necessary to
ensure that each marketplace reseller with whom the marketplace
facilitator has entered into an agreement pursuant to this
subsection has registered with the Department to collect and remit
the tax imposed by NRS 368A.200.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section and section 8
of this act, the provisions of subsection 1 apply regardless of
whether:
(a) The marketplace reseller for whom a marketplace
facilitator makes or facilitates a resale would not have been
required to collect and remit the tax pursuant to this chapter had
the resale not been facilitated by the marketplace facilitator;
(b) The marketplace reseller for whom a marketplace
facilitator makes or facilitates a resale was required to register
with the Department to collect and remit the tax imposed by
NRS 368A.200; or
(c) The amount of the sales price of a resale will ultimately
accrue to or benefit the marketplace facilitator, the marketplace
reseller or any other person.
Sec. 8. 1. In administering the provisions of this chapter,
the Department shall not hold a marketplace facilitator liable for
the payment of any tax imposed by this chapter which is
attributable to a resale made or facilitated on behalf of a
marketplace reseller who is not an affiliate of the marketplace
facilitator if:
(a) The marketplace facilitator provides proof satisfactory to
the Department that the marketplace facilitator has made a
reasonable effort to obtain accurate information from the
marketplace reseller about the sale; and
(b) The failure to collect and remit the correct tax on the resale
was due to incorrect information provided to the marketplace
facilitator by the marketplace reseller.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, in
administering the provisions of this chapter, the Department shall
not hold a marketplace facilitator liable for the payment of any tax
-
*SB431_R2*

– 7 –
imposed by this chapter which is attributable to a resale made or
facilitated on behalf of a marketplace reseller who is not an
affiliate of the marketplace facilitator if the marketplace facilitator
provides proof satisfactory to the Department that the resale was
made before January 1, 2028.
3. The relief from liability provided pursuant to subsection 2
for the 2026 and 2027 calendar years, respectively, must not
exceed 5 percent of the total tax imposed by NRS 368A.200 owed
for the calendar year on the taxable receipts of the marketplace
facilitator from resales made or facilitated by the marketplace
facilitator for one or more marketplace resellers.
4. If a marketplace facilitator is relieved of liability for the
collection and remittance of any amount of the tax imposed by
NRS 368A.200 pursuant to subsection 1, the marketplace reseller
is liable for the payment of such uncollected, unpaid or unremitted
tax.
5. To the extent that a marketplace facilitator is relieved of
liability for the collection and remittance of any tax pursuant to
subsections 2 and 3, the marketplace reseller for whom the
marketplace facilitator made or facilitated the resale giving rise to
the tax is also relieved of such liability.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve any
person of liability for collecting but failing to remit to the
Department any tax imposed by this chapter.
Sec. 9. 1. The Department may provide by regulation that,
except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of this
chapter relating to the imposition, collection and remittance of the
tax imposed by NRS 368A.200 apply to a referrer during a
calendar year in which or during a calendar year immediately
following any calendar year in which:
(a) The cumulative gross receipts from retail sales of tangible
personal property to customers in this State and sales and resales
of admission to any facility in this State where live entertainment
is provided, which result from referrals from a platform of the
referrer, are in excess of $100,000; or
(b) There are 200 or more separate sales transactions
involving sales of tangible personal property to customers in this
State and sales and resales of admission to any facility in this State
where live entertainment is provided resulting from referrals from
a platform of the referrer.
2. Any regulations adopted by the Department pursuant to
subsection 1 must provide that the provisions of this chapter
relating to the imposition, collection and remittance of the tax
imposed by NRS 368A.200 do not apply to a referrer described in
subsection 1 if the referrer:
-
*SB431_R2*

– 8 –
(a) Posts a conspicuous notice on each platform of the referrer
that includes all of the following:
(1) A statement that the tax imposed by NRS 368A.200 is
due on certain purchases;
(2) A statement that the marketplace reseller from whom
the person is purchasing on the platform may or may not collect
and remit the tax imposed by NRS 368A.200 on a purchase;
(3) Information informing the purchaser that the notice is
provided under the requirements of this section; and
(4) Instructions for obtaining additional information from
the Department regarding whether and how to remit the tax
imposed by NRS 368A.200;
(b) The referrer provides a monthly notice to each marketplace
reseller to whom the referrer made a referral of a potential
customer for admission to any facility in this State where live
entertainment is provided during the previous calendar year. Such
monthly notice must contain all of the following:
(1) A statement that Nevada imposes the tax imposed by
NRS 368A.200 on admission to any facility in this State where live
entertainment is provided;
(2) A statement that a marketplace facilitator must collect
and remit the tax imposed by NRS 368A.200; and
(3) Instructions for obtaining additional information from
the Department regarding the collection and remittance of the tax
imposed by NRS 368A.200; and
(c) The referrer provides the Department with periodic reports
in an electronic format and in the manner prescribed by the
Department. Such reports must contain all of the following:
(1) A list of marketplace resellers who received a notice
from the referrer pursuant to paragraph (b);
(2) A list on a platform of the referrer of marketplace
resellers that collect and remit the tax imposed by NRS 368A.200
and that list or advertise the resale of admission to any facility in
this State where live entertainment is provided; and
(3) An affidavit signed under penalty of perjury from an
officer of the referrer affirming that the referrer made reasonable
efforts to comply with the applicable notice and reporting
requirements of this subsection.
3. Any regulations adopted by the Department pursuant to
subsection 1 must apply only to referrals by a referrer and must
not preclude the applicability of other provisions of this chapter to
a person who is a referrer and is also a licensed gaming
establishment, the owner or operator of the facility where the live
entertainment is provided, a reseller, a marketplace facilitator or a
marketplace reseller.
-
*SB431_R2*

– 9 –
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Platform” means an electronic or physical medium,
including, without limitation, an Internet website or catalog, that
is owned, operated or controlled by a referrer.
(b) “Referral” means the transfer though telephone, an
Internet link or other means by a referrer of a potential customer
to a reseller who advertises or lists on a platform of the referrer
the resale of admission to any facility in this State where live
entertainment is provided.
(c) “Referrer”:
(1) Means a person who does all of the following:
(I) Contracts or otherwise agrees with a reseller or
marketplace facilitator to list or advertise for resale admission to
any facility in this State where live entertainment is provided on
behalf of a reseller or marketplace facilitator on a platform,
provided such listing or advertisement identifies whether or not
the reseller or marketplace facilitator collects the tax imposed by
NRS 368A.200;
(II) Receives a commission, fee or other consideration
from the reseller or marketplace facilitator for the listing or
advertisement;
(III) Provides referrals to a reseller or marketplace
facilitator, or an affiliate of a reseller or marketplace facilitator;
and
(IV) Does not collect money or any other consideration
from the customer for the transaction.
(2) Does not include:
(I) A person primarily engaged in the business of
printing or publishing a newspaper; or
(II) A person who does not provide the reseller’s or
marketplace facilitator’s shipping terms and who does not
advertise whether a reseller or marketplace facilitator collects the
tax imposed by NRS 368A.200.
Sec. 10. 1. Nothing in sections 7 to 10, inclusive, of this act
shall be construed to create any remedy or private right of action
against a marketplace facilitator.
2. A marketplace facilitator that is required to collect the
taxes imposed by this chapter is immune from civil liability for
claims arising from or related to the overpayment of taxes imposed
by this chapter if the marketplace facilitator acts in good faith and
without malicious intent.
3. Nothing in this section applies to or otherwise limits:
(a) Any claim, action, mandate, power, remedy or discretion of
the Department, or an agent or designee of the Department.
-
*SB431_R2*

– 10 –
(b) The right of a taxpayer to seek a refund pursuant to NRS
368A.250 to 368A.340, inclusive.
Sec. 11. NRS 368A.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
368A.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 368A.020 to
368A.115, inclusive, and sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this act have
the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 12. NRS 368A.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
368A.110 “Taxpayer” means:
1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection] subsections 4,
5 and 6, if live entertainment that is taxable under this chapter is
provided at a licensed gaming establishment, the person licensed to
conduct gaming at that establishment.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 [and 4,] to 6,
inclusive, if live entertainment that is taxable under this chapter is
not provided at a licensed gaming establishment, the owner or
operator of the facility where the live entertainment is provided.
3. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection] subsections 4,
5 and 6, if live entertainment that is taxable under this chapter is
provided at a publicly owned facility or on public land, the person
who collects the taxable receipts.
4. If live entertainment that is taxable under this chapter is
provided by an escort, the escort or, if the escort works as an
employee, agent or independent contractor for an escort service, the
owner or operator of the escort service.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, with respect
to any tax which is due for the resale of the admission to a facility
in this State where live entertainment is provided, the reseller.
6. With respect to any tax imposed by this chapter which is
due for the resale of the admission to a facility in this State where
live entertainment is provided and which a marketplace facilitator
or referrer is required to collect, the marketplace facilitator or
referrer.
Sec. 13. NRS 368A.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
368A.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
there is hereby imposed an excise tax on admission to any facility in
this State where live entertainment is provided and on the charge for
live entertainment provided by an escort at one or more locations in
this State. The rate of the tax is:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), for admission
to a facility in this State where live entertainment is provided, 9
percent of the admission charge to the facility.
(b) For live entertainment provided by an escort who is
escorting one or more persons at a location or locations in this State,
-
*SB431_R2*

– 11 –
9 percent of the total amount, expressed in terms of money, of
consideration paid for the live entertainment provided by the escort.
2. Amounts paid for:
(a) Admission charges collected and retained by a nonprofit
religious, charitable, fraternal or other organization that qualifies as
a tax-exempt organization pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c), or by a
nonprofit corporation organized or existing under the provisions of
chapter 82 of NRS, are not taxable pursuant to this section, only if
the number of tickets to the live entertainment which are offered for
sale or other distribution to patrons, either directly or indirectly
through a partner, subsidiary, client, affiliate or other collaborator, is
less than 7,500.
(b) Gratuities directly or indirectly remitted to persons employed
at a facility where live entertainment is provided are not taxable
pursuant to this section.
(c) Fees imposed, collected and retained by an independent
financial institution in connection with the use of credit cards or
debit cards to pay the admission charge to a facility where live
entertainment is provided are not taxable pursuant to this section. As
used in this paragraph, “independent financial institution” means a
financial institution that is not the taxpayer or an owner or operator
of the facility where the live entertainment is provided or an affiliate
of any of those persons.
3. The tax imposed by this section must be added to and
collected from the purchaser at the time of purchase, whether or not
the admission for live entertainment is purchased for resale.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, in addition
to the tax imposed by subsection 1 with respect to the initial sale of
admission to any facility in this State where live entertainment is
provided, the tax imposed by subsection 1 shall also be collected by
a reseller from the purchaser at the time of the resale of admission
to a facility in this State where live entertainment is provided. A
reseller must maintain records documenting the admission charge
and tax paid by the reseller for the initial purchase of the
admission and the admission charge and tax collected when the
reseller resells the admission. The reseller shall pass through to
the purchaser the amount of the tax imposed pursuant to this
section which was paid by the reseller at the time of the initial
purchase by giving the purchaser a credit on the amount of tax
owed pursuant to this section on the resale, except that the amount
of the credit may not exceed:
(a) The amount of tax paid pursuant to this section on the
initial purchase of the admission by the reseller; or
(b) The amount of tax owed pursuant to this section on the
resale of the admission.
-
*SB431_R2*

– 12 –
 If the resale of admission to any facility in this State where live
entertainment is provided is an occasional sale, such a resale is
exempt from the payment of any additional amount of excise tax
pursuant to this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection,
an “occasional sale” is a resale of admission to a facility in this
State where live entertainment is provided by a person who is not
engaged in the business of reselling such admission, provided that
such resale is not one of a series of resales sufficient in number,
scope and character to constitute the activity of engaging in the
business of making such resales.
5. The tax imposed by subsection 1 does not apply to:
(a) Live entertainment that this State is prohibited from taxing
under the Constitution, laws or treaties of the United States or the
Nevada Constitution.
(b) Live entertainment that is governed by the Nevada
Interscholastic Activities Association pursuant to chapter 385B of
NRS or is provided or sponsored by an elementary school, junior
high school, middle school or high school, if only pupils or faculty
provide the live entertainment.
(c) An athletic contest, event, tournament or exhibition provided
by an institution of the Nevada System of Higher Education, if
students of such an institution are contestants in the contest, event,
tournament or exhibition.
(d) Live entertainment that is provided by or entirely for the
benefit of a nonprofit religious, charitable, fraternal or other
organization that qualifies as a tax-exempt organization pursuant to
26 U.S.C. § 501(c), or a nonprofit corporation organized or existing
under the provisions of chapter 82 of NRS, only if the number of
tickets to the live entertainment which are offered for sale or other
distribution to patrons, either directly or indirectly through a partner,
subsidiary, client, affiliate or other collaborator, is less than 7,500.
(e) Any boxing contest or exhibition governed by the provisions
of chapter 467 of NRS.
(f) Live entertainment that is not provided at a licensed gaming
establishment if the facility in which the live entertainment is
provided has a maximum occupancy of less than 200 persons.
(g) Live entertainment that is provided at a licensed gaming
establishment that is licensed for less than 51 slot machines, less
than 6 games, or any combination of slot machines and games
within those respective limits, if the facility in which the live
entertainment is provided has a maximum occupancy of less than
200 persons.
(h) Live entertainment that is provided at a trade show.
-
*SB431_R2*

– 13 –
(i) Music performed by musicians who move constantly through
the audience if no other form of live entertainment is afforded to the
patrons.
(j) Live entertainment that is provided at a licensed gaming
establishment at private meetings or dinners attended by members of
a particular organization or by a casual assemblage if the purpose of
the event is not primarily for entertainment.
(k) Live entertainment that is provided in the common area of a
shopping mall, unless the entertainment is provided in a facility
located within the mall.
(l) Food and product demonstrations provided at a shopping
mall, a craft show or an establishment that sells grocery products,
housewares, hardware or other supplies for the home.
(m) Live entertainment that is incidental to an amusement ride, a
motion simulator or a similar digital, electronic, mechanical or
electromechanical attraction. For the purposes of this paragraph, live
entertainment shall be deemed to be incidental to an amusement
ride, a motion simulator or a similar digital, electronic, mechanical
or electromechanical attraction if the live entertainment is:
(1) Not the predominant element of the attraction; and
(2) Not the primary purpose for which the public rides,
attends or otherwise participates in the attraction.
(n) A race scheduled at a race track in this State and sanctioned
by the National Association for Stock Car Auto Racing, if two or
more such races are held at that race track during the same calendar
year.
(o) An athletic contest, event or exhibition conducted by a
professional team based in this State if the professional team based
in this State is a participant in the contest, event or exhibition.
(p) Live entertainment that is provided by or entirely for the
benefit of a governmental entity.
[5.] 6. As used in this section:
(a) [“Affiliate” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 463.0133.
(b)] “Maximum occupancy” means, in the following order of
priority:
(1) The maximum occupancy of the facility in which live
entertainment is provided, as determined by the State Fire Marshal
or the local governmental agency that has the authority to determine
the maximum occupancy of the facility;
(2) If such a maximum occupancy has not been determined,
the maximum occupancy of the facility designated in any permit
required to be obtained in order to provide the live entertainment; or
(3) If such a permit does not designate the maximum
occupancy of the facility, the actual seating capacity of the facility
in which the live entertainment is provided.
-
*SB431_R2*

– 14 –
[(c)] (b) “Operator” includes, without limitation, a person who
operates a facility where live entertainment is provided or who
presents, produces or otherwise provides live entertainment.
Sec. 13.5. NRS 368A.220 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
368A.220 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section:
(a) Each taxpayer who is a licensed gaming establishment shall
file with the Board, on or before the 15th day of each month, a
report showing the amount of all taxable receipts for the preceding
month or the month in which the taxable events occurred. The report
must be in a form prescribed by the Board.
(b) All other taxpayers shall file with the Department, on or
before the last day of each month, a report showing the amount of
all taxable receipts for the preceding month. The report must be in a
form prescribed by the Department.
2. The Board or the Department, if it deems it necessary to
ensure payment to or facilitate the collection by the State of the tax
imposed by NRS 368A.200, may require reports to be filed not later
than 10 days after the end of each calendar quarter.
3. Each report required to be filed by this section must be
accompanied by the amount of the tax that is due for the period
covered by the report.
4. Except as otherwise provided in [this] subsection [,] 5, the
Board and the Department shall deposit all taxes, interest and
penalties they receive pursuant to this chapter in the State Treasury
for credit to the State General Fund. [On or before October 1 of each
year, the] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the State
Controller shall distribute monthly 1/36 of all fees, taxes, interest
and penalties which derive from the tax imposed pursuant to this
chapter to the regional transportation commission created in a
county whose population is 700,000 or more. A regional
transportation commission receiving a distribution pursuant to
this subsection must use the money distributed to operate and
maintain a public transit system as defined in NRS 277A.120.
5. The Department shall deposit the first $150,000 from the
taxes, interest and penalties it receives pursuant to this chapter
during each fiscal year in the State Treasury for credit to the
Nevada Arts Council created by NRS 233C.025. The amount
deposited in the State Treasury for credit to the Nevada Arts Council
pursuant to this subsection is hereby authorized for expenditure by
the Nevada Arts Council as a continuing appropriation.
Sec. 13.6. NRS 368A.220 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
368A.220 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section:
-
*SB431_R2*

– 15 –
(a) Each taxpayer who is a licensed gaming establishment shall
file with the Board, on or before the 15th day of each month, a
report showing the amount of all taxable receipts for the preceding
month or the month in which the taxable events occurred. The report
must be in a form prescribed by the Board.
(b) All other taxpayers shall file with the Department, on or
before the last day of each month, a report showing the amount of
all taxable receipts for the preceding month. The report must be in a
form prescribed by the Department.
2. The Board or the Department, if it deems it necessary to
ensure payment to or facilitate the collection by the State of the tax
imposed by NRS 368A.200, may require reports to be filed not later
than 10 days after the end of each calendar quarter.
3. Each report required to be filed by this section must be
accompanied by the amount of the tax that is due for the period
covered by the report.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the Board and
the Department shall deposit all taxes, interest and penalties they
receive pursuant to this chapter in the State Treasury for credit to the
State General Fund. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5,
the State Controller shall distribute monthly [1/36] one-ninth of all
fees, taxes, interest and penalties which derive from the tax imposed
pursuant to this chapter to the regional transportation commission
created in a county whose population is 700,000 or more. A regional
transportation commission receiving a distribution pursuant to this
subsection must use the money distributed to operate and maintain a
public transit system as defined in NRS 277A.120.
5. The Department shall deposit the first $150,000 from the
taxes, interest and penalties it receives pursuant to this chapter
during each fiscal year in the State Treasury for credit to the Nevada
Arts Council created by NRS 233C.025. The amount deposited in
the State Treasury for credit to the Nevada Arts Council pursuant to
this subsection is hereby authorized for expenditure by the Nevada
Arts Council as a continuing appropriation.
Sec. 13.8. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Taxation for personnel,
operating and information services expenses to carry out the
provisions of sections 1 to 14, inclusive, of this act the following
sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $560,375
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $677,068
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
-
*SB431_R2*

– 16 –
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 13.9. 1. The amendatory provisions of section 13.5 of
this act apply only to the distribution of taxes, interest and penalties
received from any tax imposed by NRS 368A.200 for a taxable
period beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
2. The amendatory provisions of section 13.6 of this act apply
only to the distribution of taxes, interest and penalties received from
any tax imposed by NRS 368A.200 for a taxable period beginning
on or after July 1, 2029.
Sec. 14. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 13.5, inclusive, and subsection 1 of section
13.9 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
3. Section 13.8 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
4. Section 13.5 and subsection 1 of section 13.9 of this act
expire by limitation on June 30, 2029, if and only if a
recommendation for the imposition of a tax pursuant to NRS
277A.480 on the gross receipts of a retailer from the sale of tangible
personal property sold at retail, or stored, used or otherwise
consumed, in a county whose population is 700,000 or more is not
submitted to or approved by the voters of that county at a general
election held before January 1, 2029.
5. Section 13.6 and subsection 2 of section 13.9 of this act
become effective on July 1, 2029, if and only if a recommendation
for the imposition of a tax pursuant to NRS 277A.480 on the gross
receipts of a retailer from the sale of tangible personal property sold
at retail, or stored, used or otherwise consumed, in a county whose
population is 700,000 or more is not submitted to or approved by
the voters of that county at a general election held before January 1,
2029.
H
-
*SB431_R2*